District of Columbia statutes.
46-405.01

Recognition of marriages from other jurisdictions.

A marriage legally entered into in another jurisdiction between 2 persons of the same sex that is recognized as valid in that jurisdiction, that is not expressly prohibited by §§ 46-401.01 through 46-404, and has not been deemed illegal under § 46-405, shall be recognized as a marriage in the District.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1287a
as added July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-9, § 3(b), 56 DCR 3797
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-110, § 2(c), 57 DCR 27
D.C. Law 18-110 substituted “§§ 46-401.01” for “§§ 46-401”.